Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 3

Mutual Adjustments

6-51-301. Utility services other than gas or telephone.

Notwithstanding any other law, public or private, to the contrary, no municipality may render utility water service to be consumed in any area outside its municipal boundaries when all of such area is included within the scope of a certificate or certificates of convenience and necessity or other similar orders of the Tennessee public utility commission or other appropriate regulatory agency outstanding in favor of any person, firm or corporation authorized to render such utility water service. If, and to the extent that, a municipality chooses to render utility water service to be consumed within its municipal boundaries when all or part of such area is included within the scope of a certificate or certificates of convenience and necessity or other similar orders of the Tennessee public utility commission or other appropriate regulatory agency outstanding in favor of any person, firm or corporation authorized to render such utility water service, then the municipality and such person, firm or corporation shall attempt to reach agreement in writing for allocation and conveyance to the municipality of any or all public utility functions, rights, duties, property, assets, and liabilities of such person, firm or corporation so affected that justice and reason may require. If, within a reasonable time, the parties cannot agree in writing on allocation and conveyance, then either party may petition the chancery court of the district in which such area is located for a determination of value and damages suffered by such person, firm or corporation as a result of such municipal choice.

Such proceeding shall be conducted according to the laws of eminent domain, compiled in title 29, chapter 16, and shall include a determination of actual damages, incidental damages, and incidental benefits, as provided for therein, but in no event shall the amounts so determined exceed the replacement cost of the facilities.

“Municipality,” as used in this section, includes any agency, instrumentality, board, public corporation, or authority of the municipal government performing or authorized to perform such utility functions. This subsection (b) shall not apply to municipalities having a population in excess of three hundred fifty thousand (350,000), according to the federal census of 1960 or any subsequent federal census.

This section shall not apply to those counties having a population of not less than twenty-six thousand nine hundred (26,900) and not more than twenty-seven thousand (27,000), according to the federal census of 1960.

This section shall not apply in counties having a population of not less than twenty-seven thousand six hundred (27,600) nor more than twenty-seven thousand seven hundred (27,700), according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

This section shall not apply in counties having a population of not less than ten thousand seven hundred (10,700) nor more than ten thousand seven hundred seventy (10,770) or not less than twelve thousand (12,000) nor more than twelve thousand one hundred (12,100), according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

If and to the extent that a municipality incorporated after January 1, 1972, and that has been incorporated for two (2) years or longer chooses to render any utility services, other than the furnishing of natural or artificial gas or telephone service, within its municipal boundaries, when all or any part of such area is included within the scope of:

A certificate or certificates of convenience and necessity or other similar orders of the Tennessee public utility commission or other appropriate regulatory agency outstanding in favor of any person, firm or corporation authorized to render any such utility services, other than the furnishing of natural or artificial gas or telephone service; or

An order issued pursuant to title 7, chapter 82 authorizing a utility district to furnish any such utility services, other than the furnishing of natural or artificial gas or telephone service;

then the municipality and such person, firm or corporation or utility district shall attempt to reach agreement in writing for allocation and conveyance to the municipality of any or all public utility functions, including, but not limited to, those set out in § 7-82-302, excepting the furnishing of natural or artificial gas or telephone service, and of all rights, duties, property, assets and liabilities of such person, firm or corporation or utility district so affected that justice and reason may require. If, within a reasonable time, the parties cannot agree in writing on allocation and conveyance, then either party may petition the circuit court of the district in which such area is located for a determination of value and damages suffered by such person, firm or corporation or utility district as a result of such municipal choice. If the court finds that it would be in the best interests of both the municipality and the person, firm or corporation or utility district furnishing utility services in the area in question, the court may, in its discretion, order the transfer to the municipality of the entire utility system, upon compensation being paid such person, firm or corporation or utility district in such amount and in such manner as may be determined by the court. Before any such municipality may initiate any negotiation or proceedings under this subsection (d) for the allocation and conveyance to the municipality of any or all public utility functions, such action shall first have been approved by a majority of the qualified voters of such municipality voting in a referendum on the question of such municipality acquiring and exercising such public utility functions. Such referendum shall be called by resolution or ordinance duly adopted by a majority of the governing body of such municipality, and shall be held by the county election commission upon request of such governing body not less than forty-five (45) days after the adoption of such resolution or ordinance and publication in a newspaper of general circulation in such municipality once a week for a period of three (3) weeks preceding such referendum. The votes cast in such election shall be counted and the results certified as provided by law for municipal elections generally and the qualification of voters in such referendum shall be the same as those required for voting in municipal elections generally. The municipality shall pay the costs of holding such referendum.

Acts 1965, ch. 304, § 1; 1974, ch. 773, §§ 1-3; T.C.A., § 6-319; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 73; 2017, ch. 94, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” twice in (a)(1) and near the middle of (d)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 13.

6-51-302. Adjustment of boundaries of contiguous municipalities.

Whenever the boundaries of the corporate limits of municipalities are contiguous and such boundaries either are not in line with the street and lot layout of the municipalities or do not conform to existing or proposed public rights-of-way, drainage ways, utility easements, or railroad rights-of-way, these municipalities may adjust such boundaries by contract between themselves so as to avoid confusion and uncertainty about the location of the contiguous boundary or to conform the contiguous boundary to an existing public right-of-way, drainage way, utility easement, or railroad right-of-way, or to dedicated public right-of-way or lot line that appears on a recorded plat or deed, or to a proposed public right-of-way, drainage way, utility easement, or railroad right-of-way that is a part of either a comprehensive municipal or county plan, or both, approved by a municipal or county governmental body or by a legally constituted municipal planning commission, regional planning commission, or the state planning office [abolished].

Such boundary adjustments may not place any elected official into a voting or political subdivision not presently in the district that such elected official represents, and no such boundary shift may occur any less than ninety (90) days prior to any election in which affected citizens may participate if such boundary adjustment had not occurred.

Acts 1976, ch. 834, § 1; 1977, ch. 91, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 6-322.

Compiler's Notes. The state planning office, referred to in this section, was abolished by Acts 1995, ch. 501, effective June 12, 1995.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 13.